Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.46.090

Nonliability of peace officer.

A peace officer shall not be held liable in any civil action for an arrest based on probable cause, enforcement in good faith of a court order, or any other action or omission in good faith under this chapter arising from an alleged incident of harassment brought by any party to the incident.

[ 1985 c 288 s 9.]